Hawaii statutes.
[§328J‑14] Other applicable
laws. This chapter shall not be interpreted or construed to permit smoking
where it is otherwise restricted by other applicable laws. [L 2006, c 295, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next